Maryland, session 2025, SB0748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
18–110.
The Department, in partnership with the Department of Aging, the Virginia I. Jones
Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders DEMENTIAS Council, and the Greater
Maryland Chapter of the Alzheimer’s Association, shall incorporate information into
relevant public health outreach programs administered by the Department to:
(1) Educate health care providers regarding:
(i) The importance of early detection and timely diagnosis of
cognitive impairment;
– 1 –

Ch. 682 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Validated assessment tools for the detection and diagnosis of
cognitive impairment;
(iii) The value of a Medicare annual wellness visit or other annual
physical for an individual at least 65 years old for cognitive health; [and]
(iv) The Medicare care planning billing code for individuals with
cognitive impairment; and
(V) TREATMENTS APPROVED BY THE FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION FOR ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS,
INCLUDING RELEVANT INFORMATION ON TREATMENT USE AND OUTCOMES; AND
(2) Increase PUBLIC understanding and awareness of:
(i) The early warning signs of Alzheimer’s disease and [other types
of dementia] RELATED DEMENTIAS;
(ii) The value of early detection [and], diagnosis, AND TREATMENT
of Alzheimer’s disease and [other types of dementia] RELATED DEMENTIAS; and
(iii) How to reduce the risk of cognitive decline, particularly among
individuals in Black and Latino communities who are at greater risk of developing
Alzheimer’s disease and [other types of dementia] RELATED DEMENTIAS; AND
(IV) TREATMENTS APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION FOR ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS AND
RELEVANT INFORMATION ON TREATMENT USE AND OUTCOMES, INCLUDING
INFORMATION RELATED TO TREATMENT OUTCOMES BASED ON BIOLOGICAL SEX.
18–111.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE STATE–DESIGNATED
HEALTH INFORMATION EXCHANGE, SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE THAT INCLUDES IN A DOWNLOADABLE FORMAT THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) THE PREVALENCE OF ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED
DEMENTIAS IN THE STATE;
(2) THE HOSPITALIZATION RATE RELATED TO ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE
AND RELATED DEMENTIAS; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 682
(3) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PREVALENCE AND
HOSPITALIZATION RATE OF ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS
DISAGGREGATED BASED ON:
(I) AGE, INCLUDING AGE OF DIAGNOSIS;
(II) SEX;
(III) RACE;
(IV) ETHNICITY; AND
(V) NUMBER OF CASES BY COUNTY;
(VI) CO–OCCURRENCE OF DOWN SYNDROME (TRISOMY–21);
AND
(VII) TYPE OF DEMENTIA.
(B) THE WEBSITE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE THE DATA AVAILABLE FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING 5–YEAR PERIOD ENDING SEPTEMBER 30, 2025; AND
(2) BE UPDATED ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING
IN 2027, TO INCLUDE ANY NEWLY AVAILABLE DATA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –